Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-2456
Prescription Drug Monitoring Program
Fund; created; investment.

The Prescription Drug Monitoring Program Fund is created.
The Department of Health and Human Services shall administer the fund which
shall include any state funds, grants, or gifts received by the department
for the purposes of carrying out the purposes of sections 71-2454 and 71-2455.
Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2014, LB1072, § 3.
July 18, 2014
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.